Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5455HV (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2611 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 91F.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âDepartmentâ means the department of workforce 4 development. 5 2. âEmployerâ means a person who employs an employee in this 6 state for wages. 7 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 91F.2 Employment of persons with false 8 social security numbers prohibited. 9 An employer shall not hire or continue to employ an employee 10 who the employer knows to have provided the employer with a 11 social security number on any documentation for employment that 12 does not belong to the employee. 13 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 91F.3 Enforcement ââ penalties. 14 1. The department shall enforce this chapter. 15 2. An employer who violates section 91F.2 shall be subject 16 to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars to be collected by 17 the department. 18 3. For a fourth or subsequent violation of subsection 91F.2, 19 in addition to the civil penalty provided in subsection 1, 20 an employer shall cease operations at the location where the 21 violation occurred until any individual who holds a majority 22 ownership interest in the employer, and all managerial staff 23 at the location, participate in training developed by the 24 department regarding compliance with this chapter. 25 Sec. 4. Section 714.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsections: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 23. For the purpose of retaining or 28 obtaining employment, or any other thing of value, falsely 29 provides the employer or prospective employer with a social 30 security number that does not belong to that person. 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 24. An employer knowingly providing a 32 potential employee with a fraudulent social security number for 33 the purpose of hiring the potential employee. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 5455HV (2) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2611 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to unlawful practices involving providing 3 a false social security number to an employer or prospective 4 employer, or to a potential employee. 5 The bill provides that an employer may not hire or continue 6 to employ an employee whom the employer knows to have provided 7 the employer with a social security number on any documentation 8 for employment that does not belong to the employee. 9 The bill provides that an employer violating the bill is 10 subject to a $10,000 civil penalty to be collected by the 11 department of inspections, appeals, and licensing. For a 12 fourth or subsequent violation, in addition to the civil 13 penalty, an employer must cease operations at the location 14 where the violation occurred until any individual who holds a 15 majority ownership interest in the employer, and all managerial 16 staff at the location, participate in training developed by the 17 department regarding compliance with the bill. 18 The bill provides that it is a fraudulent practice for a 19 person, for the purpose of retaining or obtaining employment, 20 or any other thing of value, to falsely provide an employer 21 or prospective employer with a social security number that 22 does not belong to the person. The bill provides that it is 23 a fraudulent practice for an employer to knowingly provide a 24 potential employee with a fraudulent social security number for 25 the purpose of hiring the potential employee. 26 Penalties for fraudulent practices range from a class âCâ 27 felony to a simple misdemeanor based upon the amount of money 28 or value of property or services involved. 29 -2- LSB 5455HV (2) 91 as/js 2/ 2